Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS - STATE BOARD

23-60-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Community College and Occupational Education Act of 1967".

Source:

L. 67:

p. 437, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-1.

23-60-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the state board for community colleges and occupational education is charged to develop and establish state policy for occupational education and to govern the state system of community colleges. The board shall be responsible for the establishment of statewide career and technical education policy for all the entities which provide such education and shall coordinate all aspects of career and technical education in the state to assure quality programming and efficient delivery of such education.

In its role as the governing authority for the state system of community colleges, the board shall assure a system of two-year program delivery throughout the state coordinated, where appropriate, with the local district colleges. In order to assist the board in carrying out its responsibilities, the general assembly hereby provides for the establishment of local councils to advise the board on the operation of individual community and local district colleges from a local perspective.

The function of the two-year college system is to conduct occupational, technical, and community service programs with no term limitations and general education, including college transfer programs with unrestricted admissions. It is further the intent of this article to develop appropriate occupational education and adult education programs in these and other postsecondary educational institutions, to maintain and expand occupational education programs in the elementary and secondary schools of the state permitting local school districts already having area technical colleges to continue to operate them, and to develop work study and on-the-job training programs designed to acquaint youth with the world of work and to train and retrain youth and adults for employment. The general assembly intends that state agencies concerned with occupational education in the public schools shall cooperate with the board in planning and implementing occupational education programs, to the end that the state of Colorado has complete and well-balanced occupational and adult education programs available to the people of Colorado at all educational levels.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 437, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-2.

L. 86:

Entire section R&RE, p. 837, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 147, § 25, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1399, § 61, effective May 25.

23-60-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 60, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Area technical college" means a school offering approved postsecondary vocational programs for credit, operated by a local school district or by a board of cooperative services, and designated by the general assembly as an area technical college in conformity with standards established by the state board for community colleges and occupational education. Tuition rates and fees charged any person not enrolled in a secondary school curriculum must be uniform for any group classification. For the purposes of this article 60, the following schools are area technical colleges: The Emily Griffith technical college, the technical college of the Rockies, and the Pickens technical college.

"Occupational education" means any education designed to facilitate career and technical or occupational development of individual persons, including, but not limited to, career and technical training or retraining that is given in schools or classes, including field or laboratory work incident thereto, under public supervision and control or under contract with the board or a local educational agency and that is conducted as a part of a program designed to fit individuals for gainful employment as semiskilled or skilled workers or technicians in recognized occupations, but excluding any program to fit individuals for employment in occupations generally considered to be professional or that require a baccalaureate or higher degree. The term further includes career and technical guidance and counseling in connection with such training; instruction related to the occupation for which the person is being trained or necessary for the person to benefit from such training; and the training of persons engaged as or preparing to become career and technical education teachers, teacher-trainers, supervisors, and directors.

"Postsecondary" means related to instruction of students over the age of seventeen years who are not enrolled in a regular program of kindergarten through grade twelve in a public, independent, or parochial school.

A "registered elector" of a district means any person who is at least eighteen years of age, who is a citizen of the United States, who has resided in the state for thirty-two days, in the local college district thirty-two days, and in the dissolution election precinct thirty-two days immediately preceding the election, and who is duly registered.

"Workplace literacy program" means any program of remedial education in basic mathematics or literacy skills sponsored by one or more private employers and offered for the benefit of employees and conducted in the workplace.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 438, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-3.

L. 70:

p. 347, § 7.

L. 71:

p. 564, § 49.

L. 72:

p. 316, § 46.

L. 73:

p. 1337, § 2.

L. 74:

(4) amended, p. 420, § 70, effective April 11; (1) amended, p. 389, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 789, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(5) added, p. 867, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 198, § 10, effective April 13.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 929, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 1214, § 10, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-043), ch. 284, p. 1294, § 3, effective May 20.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 148, § 26, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1400, § 62, effective May 25; IP and (1) amended, (HB 17-1258), ch. 219, p. 851, § 2, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 265, Session Laws of Colorado 2006. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 284, Session Laws of Colorado 2009. For the legislative declaration in HB 17-1258, see section 1 of chapter 219, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

23-60-104. State board for community colleges and occupational education - student advisory council - state advisory council.

Repealed.

There is created a state board for community colleges and occupational education, which is referred to in this article as the "board". The board is a body corporate and has the authority to adopt a seal and to receive, demand, and hold for all occupational education purposes and for any educational institution under its jurisdiction such money, lands, or other property as may be donated, bequeathed, appropriated, or otherwise made available to the board, and it may use such property in the interests of community and technical colleges and occupational education in this state.

The board consists of:
(2) (a) (I) The board consists of:

One member from each congressional district in the state, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

Two members from the state at large, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate; and

Two members selected pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(III) of this section.

The board shall appoint a director of occupational education and a director of community and technical colleges with the qualifications and background specified by the board. No appointed member shall be an employee of any local district college, community or technical college, school district or agency receiving vocational funds allocated by the board, private institution of higher education, or state or private occupational school in the state. No appointed member shall be an elected or appointed statewide official of the state of Colorado or member of the governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education. The board must at no time have more than a minimum majority of the appointed members affiliated with any one political party. Members of the board shall be appointed so as to ensure that all geographic areas of the state are represented. A state student advisory council of student members who are enrolled for a minimum of nine hours shall be elected, one each, from and by the student bodies of each of the campuses governed by the board.

The first additional member must be a student at a college of a state system of community colleges, and the second additional member must be a member of the faculty of a college of the state system of community colleges. Such members shall be elected in accordance with procedures established by the board, which procedures must take into account all the colleges within the state system of community colleges. The term of said offices is one year. Said offices are advisory, without the right to vote and without the right to attend executive sessions.

The term of office for each member appointed by the governor is four years; except that a member of the board who is appointed by the governor shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed and confirmed by the senate, and the terms of members appointed by the governor shall be staggered so that no more than a minimum majority of the appointed members' terms expire in the same year. The terms of the offices of members of the state student advisory council shall be one year. A member appointed to the board shall not serve for more than two consecutive full four-year terms. Members of the board shall receive fifty dollars per diem for attendance at official meetings, plus actual and necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of official business.

If a member appointed by the governor moves out of the congressional district from which the member was appointed, a vacancy is created. A member who moves out of such congressional district shall promptly notify the governor of the date of such move, but such notice is not required for the vacancy to occur. Any vacancy in the office of any member of the board appointed by the governor shall be filled by appointment of the governor with the consent of the senate for the unexpired term. Any vacancy on the state student advisory council shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the duly elected student government of the affected campus within thirty days after such vacancy occurs.

Repealed.

The board shall appoint an executive officer of the board, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board and shall receive compensation commensurate with his duties as determined by the board. Offices held by the executive officer and professional personnel are declared to be educational in nature and not under the state personnel system.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 438, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-4.

L. 71:

p. 1305, § 7.

L. 72:

p. 552, § 19.

L. 73:

p. 1335, § 1.

L. 75:

(2) amended, p. 741, § 8, effective January 1, 1976; (2)(a) amended, p. 509, § 2, effective January 1, 1976.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 1126, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 78:

(2)(a) amended, p. 383, § 1, effective March 17; (3) amended, p. 385, § 1, effective April 4.

L. 79:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1637, § 36, effective July 19.

L. 81:

(2)(a) amended, p. 852, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 353, § 10, effective April 30.

L. 85:

(2)(a) amended, p. 769, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(3) amended, p. 415, § 26, effective March 26; entire section amended, p. 838, § 2, effective April 14.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 695, § 10, effective April 20; (2)(b) amended, p. 900, § 40, effective June 5.

L. 97:

(3) repealed, p. 1093, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2001:

(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 146, § 2, effective March 23.

L. 2006:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1234, § 9, effective May 26.

L. 2019:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 19-1152), ch. 58, p. 199, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) repealed and (2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 42, § 52, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2) in Senate Bill 75-384 and House Bill 75-1232 were harmonized.

23-60-104.5. Recommendations of governor's task force - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

On December 23, 2003, by executive order, the governor established the governor's task force to strengthen and improve the community college system;

The task force was charged with evaluating the current structure of governance and administration in the state system of community colleges and recommending reforms and cost savings to the governor, the Colorado commission on higher education, the board, and, if applicable, the general assembly;

The task force met ten times and sponsored five public forums at community colleges around the state;

The task force made six recommendations to the governor along with a two-year timeline for completing each recommendation and sending periodic reports to the governor;

These recommendations were:

Decreasing the administrative costs of the system office;

Maintaining a central system office but restructuring its functions;

Centralizing and standardizing the information technology functions of the system office;

Decentralizing institutional research functions of the colleges;

Restructuring of distance learning; and

Completing a comprehensive review of the administrative costs for career and technical education;

The task force recommended that any cost savings achieved from the recommendations, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section, should go to program providers for enhancing services pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of this section;

The task force recommended that the board conduct a comprehensive examination of the Lowry campus, including how to develop the land to its highest and best use and how any funds resulting from these changes may be invested in the classrooms of the state system of community colleges;

The task force established a timeline for the board to follow and included in that timeline periodic reports to the governor; and

It is in the best interests of the public that some of these recommendations be put into statute.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Colleges" means the community colleges under the control of the board.

"System office" means the office under the board that provides services to all of the colleges.

"Task force" means the governor's task force established pursuant to an executive order dated December 23, 2003.

For the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2004, and ending on June 30, 2005, the board shall reduce the state-funded administrative costs of the system office by at least twenty percent.

The moneys available because of the reductions required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be used to finance the following recommendations of the task force:

The installation of a centralized, standardized, integrated, system-wide information technology system solution for the colleges.

On or before July 1, 2004, the board shall begin implementation of the centralized, standardized, integrated, system-wide information technology configuration for the colleges. The implementation of the information technology configuration shall be substantially completed on or before June 30, 2006. The board and the colleges shall adopt best practices for all business processes.

By January 1, 2005, the restructuring of distance learning at all colleges by requiring the system office to provide and all colleges to use a common utility infrastructure and maintain a common standard for security and accreditation;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 1016, § 10, effective June 2, 2005.)

By July 1, 2004, conducting a comprehensive review by the board of the administrative costs for career and technical education.

Any remaining moneys available because of the reductions required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) after the financing of the recommendations specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) shall be used in delivering classroom instruction and in support of the colleges.

On or before June 30, 2005, the state board shall develop a master plan for the use, development, or sale of the real property at the Lowry campus, except for the property used by the community college of Aurora or the community college of Denver. Nothing in this section shall prevent the board from allowing a charter school to be located at the Lowry campus prior to the development of the master plan, and nothing in the master plan shall cause the displacement of a charter school.

On or before June 30, 2006, the state board may enter into an agreement with a third-party master developer to carry out the use, development, or sale of the real property for the Lowry campus.

As used in this subsection (5), unless the context otherwise requires, "net proceeds from the Lowry property" means the proceeds from the sale, ground lease, or other disposition of the real estate interests of the state board at the Lowry campus, less the actual and reasonable costs of completing the transaction and less any unsatisfied debt or other obligation relating to such real estate interests.

The net proceeds from the Lowry property may be maintained in an account for use by the state board for capital-development-related projects at the system office or the colleges.

On or before October 1, 2004, July 1, 2005, and July 1, 2006, the board shall submit to the governor and to the education committees of the senate and house of representatives reports on the progress made in implementing the recommendations contained in this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1529, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 2005:

(3)(a) and (3)(b)(III) amended, p. 1016, § 10, effective June 2.

23-60-105. Staff and appointments. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 67:

p. 439, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-26-5.

L. 86:

Entire section repealed, p. 841, § 7, effective April 14.

23-60-106. Notification concerning gaming schools.

The board shall notify the limited gaming control commission created in section 44-30-301 of any educational program or school offering instruction in occupations relating to limited gaming or any other gambling.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1590, § 12, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 245, § 28, effective October 1.

23-60-107. State board for community colleges and occupational education fund - creation - control - use.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the state board for community colleges and occupational education fund which shall be under the control of and administered by the board in accordance with the provisions of this article. Except as otherwise allowed by section 24-36-103 (2), C.R.S., all moneys received or acquired by the board or by any of the institutions it governs, whether by appropriation, grant, contract, or gift, by sale or lease of surplus real or personal property, or by any other means, whose disposition is not otherwise provided for by law, and all interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to said fund. The moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the board and shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

The moneys in the state board for community colleges and occupational education fund shall be used by the board for the payment of salaries and operating expenses of the board and of the institutions it governs and for the payment of any other expenses incurred by the board in carrying out its statutory powers and duties.

Moneys in the state board for community colleges and occupational education fund which are not needed for immediate use by the board may be invested by the state treasurer in investments authorized by sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. The board shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund which may be invested and shall notify the state treasurer in writing of such amount.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 318, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 369, § 6, effective September 1.

23-60-108. Board responsibilities - direct care provider career path pilot program - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 959, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2008. (See L. 2002, p. 959.)

23-60-109. Career pathways - design - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The board developed the manufacturing career pathway pursuant to part 10 of this article after consulting with local district colleges and area technical colleges, and in collaboration with the department of labor and employment, the department of higher education, the department of education, and the state work force development council, created in section 24-46.3-101, C.R.S.;

The manufacturing career pathway was based upon guidelines endorsed by the state work force development council; and

The knowledge and experience gained through the process of designing and implementing the manufacturing career pathway should inform the design and implementation of additional career pathways pursuant to section 24-46.3-104, C.R.S.

The board shall collaborate with the state work force development council to design career pathways pursuant to the provisions of section 24-46.3-104, C.R.S. The state work force development council is responsible for coordinating the design of the career pathways. Career pathways designed pursuant to section 24-46.3-104, C.R.S., must use the model developed to create the manufacturing career pathway pursuant to section 23-60-1003, including any improvements to the model based upon the implementation of the manufacturing career pathway. Career pathways created pursuant to section 24-46.3-104, C.R.S., must have the components described in section 23-60-1003 (2), as they relate to the specific career pathway being created.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1274), ch. 196, p. 665, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 148, § 27, effective August 10.

23-60-110. Teaching career pathway - design.

No later than the 2022-23 academic year, the department of higher education, in collaboration with the department of education, the board, and the deans of the schools of education and academic administrators in Colorado institutions of higher education, or their designees, shall design a career pathway, as defined in section 23-60-1002 (2), for students to enter the teaching profession. The teaching career pathway must connect school districts, local district colleges, community colleges, and four-year institutions of higher education with adult programs, and may allow a student to earn income while progressing along the career pathway. The board shall approve all pathways that begin in middle or high school.

The teaching career pathway must be aligned with the performance-based teacher licensing standards adopted by the state board of education pursuant to section 22-2-109 (3). In addition, the pathway must include the following components:

Secondary, adult education, and postsecondary education options, with a nonduplicative, clearly articulated course progression from one level of instruction to the next, with opportunities to earn postsecondary credits, maximize credit for prior learning, and secure educator licensure;

Academic and career counseling resources; best practices in wraparound support services, particularly at transition points along the teaching career pathway; and support and development of individual career and academic plans; and

Curriculum and instructional strategies that are appropriate for adult students and that embed learning and skill-building in a work-related context.

The department of education shall direct each school district to publicize the teaching career pathway on its website and social media and the department of higher education shall direct each community college campus and four-year institutional campus to publicize the teaching career pathway on its website and social media.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-185), ch. 246, p. 1325, § 4, effective September 7.